Utah statutes.
65A-3-2.   Prohibited acts on state lands.

(1)  A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor who:

(a)  throws or places any lighted cigarette, cigar, firecracker, ashes, or other flaming or glowing substance which may cause a fire on a highway or wildland;

(b)  obstructs the state forester, or any of his deputies, in the performance of controlling a fire;

(c)  refuses, on proper request of the state forester or any of his deputies, to assist in the controlling of a fire, without good and sufficient reason; or

(d)  fires any tracer or incendiary ammunition anywhere except within the confines of established military reservations.

(2)  Fines assessed under this section are deposited in the General Fund.

